Montana, session 2025, HB36.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 3-1-1101, MCA, is amended to read:
"3-1-1101. Creation and composition of commission. (1) There is created a judicial standards
commission consisting of five members as follows:
(a) two district court judges appointed by the speaker of the house as provided in 3-1-1115 and
confirmed by the senate;
(b) one attorney who has practiced law in this state for at least 10 years, appointed by the attorney
general and confirmed by the senate; and
(c) two citizens who are not attorneys or judges of any court, active or retired, appointed by the
governor and confirmed by the senate.
(2) Members shall serve staggered 4-year terms.
(3) A district court judge may not serve as the presiding officer of the commission."
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 36